Ohio, session 136, HB974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.622 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.622. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of state route number four hundred twenty-one between west drive and United States route forty-two, in Medina county, shall be known as the "LCpl Richard O. Fisher Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.